Nevada, session 83, SB420.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Title 22 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new chapter to consist of the provisions set forth as
sections 2 to 20.7, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 2. This chapter may be cited as the Business
Improvement District Law.
Sec. 3. The provisions of sections 2 to 20.7, inclusive, of this
act, apply only in a region of this State for which there has been
created by interstate compact a regional planning agency and the
regional plan adopted by the regional planning agency calls for
the regulation of transportation and visitor activities.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in sections 5 to 10.5,
inclusive, of this act have the meanings ascribed to them in those
sections.
Sec. 5. “Activity” includes, without limitation, any of the
following activities:
1. The promotion of public events;
2. Marketing and economic development, including, without
limitation, the recruitment and retention of retail establishments;
3. Transportation; and
4. Any other service that benefits businesses in the district.
Sec. 6. “Business” means all types of businesses, including,
without limitation, financial institutions and professions.
Sec. 6.5. “Business owner” means a person recognized by
the county or State as the owner of the business on a business
license issued by the county or State.
Sec. 7. “District” means a business improvement district
created pursuant to section 15 of this act.
Sec. 8. “District management plan” means a district
management plan as described in section 12 of this act.
Sec. 9. “Improvement” means the acquisition, construction,
installation or maintenance of any tangible property,
appurtenances and incidentals.
Sec. 10. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 10.5. “Owners’ association” means a nonprofit entity
that is under contract with a county to administer or implement
the improvements and activities set forth in the district
management plan. The term includes, without limitation, a newly
created nonprofit, an existing nonprofit and a nonprofit
cooperative corporation formed in the manner prescribed in NRS
81.410 to 81.540, inclusive.
-
*SB420_R1*

– 5 –
Sec. 11. 1. A person may submit a petition to create a
business improvement district to the board of county
commissioners. Such a petition must:
(a) Be signed by the business owners in the proposed district
who will pay more than 50 percent of the total amount of
assessments proposed to be levied; and
(b) Include a district management plan that complies with the
requirements set forth in section 12 of this act.
2. For the purposes of determining whether the petition was
signed by the business owners who will pay more than 50 percent
of the total amount of assessments proposed to be levied:
(a) The amount of assessments attributable to a business
owned by the business owner that is in excess of 40 percent of the
amount of all assessments proposed to be levied must not be
included; and
(b) The signature of an authorized representative of a business
owner shall be deemed to be the signature of the business owner.
3. Upon submission of a petition received by a board of
county commissioners pursuant to subsection 1 and in accordance
with the requirements of sections 2 to 20.7, inclusive, of this act, a
board of county commissioners may initiate proceedings to create
a business improvement district. A district may acquire, improve,
equip, operate and maintain any improvement or activity within
the district relating to transportation or visitor activities within the
district provided that such improvement or activity confers a
benefit to the businesses subject to the assessment.
Sec. 12. 1. A district management plan must include,
without limitation:
(a) A map of the district that depicts each business in the
district in sufficient detail to allow a business owner to reasonably
determine whether a business is located within the district.
(b) The name of the proposed district.
(c) A description of the boundaries of the district, including
the proposed boundaries of the zones that will benefit from the
district in sufficient detail to identify the affected businesses.
(d) A description of the activities proposed for each year the
district will operate and the estimated cost of such activities. If the
activities proposed for each year of the operation of the district are
the same, the description may detail the proposed activities and
include a statement that the same activities are proposed for the
subsequent years of operation.
(e) The total amount of the annual expenditures for the
activities and debt collection in each year the district will operate,
which may be estimated based upon the rate of the assessment. If
the total amount of annual expenditures in each year is not
-
*SB420_R1*

– 6 –
significantly different, the district management plan may include
the total amount of annual expenditures for the first year and a
statement that a similar amount applies for the subsequent years
of operation.
(f) The proposed source or sources of financing of the
activities in the district, including, without limitation, the proposed
method and basis of levying the assessments and whether bonds
will be issued to finance improvements, maintenance or activities.
The method for levying the assessments must include sufficient
information for a business owner to calculate the amount of the
assessments to be levied against his or her business.
(g) The time and manner of collecting the assessments.
(h) The total number of years in which the assessments will be
levied.
(i) The proposed amount of time to implement the district
management plan.
(j) Any proposed rules and regulations to be applied to the
district.
(k) A list of each business proposed to be assessed, including,
without limitation, a statement of the method or methods by which
the expenses of a district will be imposed upon the businesses that
benefit from the district, in proportion to the benefit received by
the business, to defray the cost thereof.
(l) Any other information or material required by the board of
county commissioners.
2. A district management plan may:
(a) Set forth specific increases in assessments for each year of
operation of the district; or
(b) Designate an owners’ association to provide the
improvements and activities described in the district management
plan.
Sec. 13. 1. Upon receiving a petition submitted pursuant to
section 11 of this act, the board of county commissioners shall
hold a public hearing to consider the petition. Not less than 45
days before holding the public hearing, the board of county
commissioners shall mail a notice of the meeting to each business
owner subject to the proposed assessment whose business is
located in the proposed district. The notice must include, without
limitation:
(a) The proposed method and basis of levying assessments;
(b) If there is a proposal for an increase in assessments for
each year of operation of the district, the proposed increase or
increases in the amount or rate of assessments for each year;
(c) A general description of the activities the assessments will
fund;
-
*SB420_R1*

– 7 –
(d) The address to which business owners may mail a protest
against the assessments;
(e) The telephone number and address of a person, office or
organization that an interested person may contact to receive
additional information about the assessments;
(f) A statement that if protests are received from the owners or
authorized representatives of the businesses in the proposed
district who will pay more than 50 percent of the total amount of
assessments proposed to be levied, the board of county
commissioners will be prohibited pursuant to subsection 4 from
establishing the district; and
(g) The date, time and location of the public hearing.
2. In addition to the notice provided pursuant to subsection 1,
the board of county commissioners shall publish notice of the
public hearing in accordance with NRS 271.190.
3. Any interested person may make a protest orally or in
writing. A written protest must be filed with the county clerk at or
before the time of the public hearing. A written protest may be
withdrawn in writing at any time before the conclusion of the
public hearing. A written protest must include, without limitation,
a description of the business in which the person submitting the
protest has an interest and written evidence that the person is the
owner of the business or an authorized representative. A written
protest that does not contain the information required by this
subsection must not be counted in determining whether the
protests are received from the owners or authorized
representatives of the businesses in the proposed district who will
pay more than 50 percent of the total amount of assessments
proposed to be levied.
4. If protests are received from the owners or authorized
representatives of the businesses in the proposed district who will
pay more than 50 percent of the total amount of assessments
proposed to be levied by the end of the period to withdraw a
protest, the board of county commissioners shall not take any
further action to create a district as contained in the petition
submitted pursuant to section 11 of this act for a period of 1 year
from the date the board of county commissioners finds that there
are enough protests to satisfy the requirements of this subsection.
Sec. 14. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, at
the conclusion of a public hearing to establish a district, the board
of county commissioners may adopt, revise, change, reduce or
modify the proposed assessments or the types of activities to be
funded with the assessments as set forth in the district
management plan submitted pursuant to section 11 of this act.
-
*SB420_R1*

– 8 –
2. The board of county commissioners shall not increase the
amount of any proposed assessment. Any changes to the
boundaries of a proposed district may only exclude properties or
businesses that will not benefit from the proposed activities.
Sec. 15. 1. Following the public hearing held pursuant to
section 13 of this act, the board of county commissioners may by
ordinance create a business improvement district. The ordinance
must include, without limitation:
(a) A description of the proposed activities to be performed by
the proposed district;
(b) The amount of the proposed assessments;
(c) A statement indicating whether bonds will be issued;
(d) A description of the exterior boundaries of the proposed
district or a reference to the map that is submitted to the board of
county commissioners pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1
of section 12 of this act;
(e) The date of adoption;
(f) The time and place where the public hearing was held
pursuant to section 13 of this act concerning the creation of the
district;
(g) A determination regarding any protests received by the
board of county commissioners;
(h) A statement that the businesses in the district created by
the ordinance are subject to any amendments to this chapter;
(i) A statement that the activities to be conferred on businesses
in the district will be funded by the levy of assessments; and
(j) A finding that the businesses within the boundaries of the
district will be benefited by the activities funded by the proposed
assessments.
2. The board of county commissioners shall not create a
district if the board of county commissioners receives protests
from the owners or the authorized representatives of the
businesses who will pay more than 50 percent of the total amount
of proposed assessments.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the board
of county commissioners shall not create a district when the
proposed boundaries of the district overlap with the boundaries of
another district created pursuant to this chapter. The boundaries
of the district may overlap with the boundaries of another district
created pursuant to this chapter if the benefit conferred is
different from the benefit conferred by the other district.
4. The board of county commissioners shall not create a
district within the jurisdiction of another county without the
consent of the board of county commissioners of the county.
-
*SB420_R1*

– 9 –
5. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the
maximum term of a new district is 5 years. Upon renewal, a
district may have an additional term not longer than 10 years.
Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, a district
created pursuant to this section to finance capital improvements
with bonds may levy assessments until the maximum maturity of
the bonds.
6. If a district is created by ordinance, the county clerk shall
maintain and make available for inspection by the public a copy of
the district management plan.
Sec. 15.3. 1. Any district whose term has expired or will
expire may be renewed by following the procedures to establish a
district set forth in this chapter. The boundaries, assessments,
improvements or activities of a renewed district may be different
from the boundaries, assessments, improvements or activities of
the previous district.
2. If a district is renewed, any remaining revenues from the
levy of assessments or any revenues from the sale of assets
acquired with the revenues must be transferred to the renewed
district. If a renewed district includes businesses that were not
included in the previous district, the remaining revenues must be
spent to benefit only the businesses in the previous district. If a
renewed district does not include businesses that were included in
the previous district, the remaining revenues attributable to such
businesses must be spent in accordance with the district
management plan of the previous district.
3. A renewed district may have a term not to exceed 10 years
or until the maximum maturity of the bonds issued by the district.
Sec. 15.7. 1. If the district management plan designates an
owners’ association to administer or implement the improvements
and activities set forth in the district management plan, the board
of county commissioners shall contract with the nonprofit entity
that comprises the owners’ association to administer or implement
the improvements and activities set forth in the district
management plan.
2. Regardless of whether an owners’ association administers
or implements the improvements and activities set forth in the
district management plan, the provisions of NRS 338.013 to
338.090, inclusive, apply to any project of the district for an
improvement or activity, in the same manner as if a public body
had awarded a contract for the project, even if the project does not
qualify as a public work.
3. If an owners’ association is designated in the district
management plan, the owners’ association shall prepare and
submit a report to the county clerk not later than the end of each
-
*SB420_R1*

– 10 –
fiscal year for each upcoming fiscal year in which assessments are
levied. The first report is due at the end of the first fiscal year in
which the district is created. The report must include, without
limitation:
(a) The name of the district;
(b) The fiscal year for which the report applies;
(c) The improvements and activities that will be provided for
the fiscal year for which the report applies;
(d) An estimate of the cost of providing the improvements and
activities for the fiscal year for which the report applies;
(e) The estimated amount of surplus or deficit from the fiscal
year preceding the fiscal year for which the report applies, which
is calculated by subtracting the expenditures from the revenue of
that previous fiscal year; and
(f) Any proposed changes to the assessment, improvements or
activities described in the district management plan.
Sec. 16. 1. An assessment levied on a business owner in a
district created in accordance with this chapter must be levied on
the basis of the estimated benefit to the businesses within the
district. The board of county commissioners shall determine the
structure of the assessments to ensure the assessments correspond
with the distribution of benefits from the proposed activities.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the
revenue from the levy of assessments within a district must not be
used to provide activities outside the district or for any purpose
other than the purposes specified in the ordinance adopted
pursuant to section 15 of this act. Activities that are provided
outside the boundaries of a district to create a special or specific
benefit may only include marketing or signage.
3. The board of county commissioners may:
(a) Establish separate benefit zones within the district based on
the degree of benefit that each zone will receive from the activities
that will be provided in the benefit zone and impose a different
assessment within each benefit zone; and
(b) Define categories of businesses based on the degree of
benefit that each category will receive from the activities that will
be provided to each category and impose a different assessment or
assessment rate within each category of business or each category
of business within each benefit zone.
Sec. 17. After the adoption of an ordinance creating a
district in accordance with this chapter, the board of county
commissioners and the Department of Taxation may enter into an
agreement specifying the dates and procedures for the distribution
to the county of any money pledged pursuant to section 15 of this
act. The distributions must:
-
*SB420_R1*

– 11 –
1. Be made not less frequently than once each calendar
quarter; and
2. Cease at the end of the fiscal year in which the district
expires.
Sec. 18. On or before September 1 of each year, the board of
county commissioners that adopts an ordinance pursuant to
section 15 of this act shall prepare and submit to the Director of
the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmission to
the Legislature, or to the Legislative Commission when the
Legislature is not in regular session, an annual report containing:
1. A statement of the status of the activities located or
expected to be located in the district, and of any changes in that
status since the previous annual report.
2. An assessment of the financial impact of the district on the
provision of local governmental services, including, without
limitation, services for police protection and fire protection.
Sec. 19. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, if
the board of county commissioners adopts an ordinance pursuant
to section 15 of this act, the county may:
(a) Issue, at one time or from time to time, bonds or notes as
special obligations under the Local Government Securities Law to
finance or refinance projects for the benefit of the district. Any
such bonds or notes may be secured by a pledge of, and be payable
from, any money pledged pursuant to section 15 of this act and
received by the county with respect to the district, any revenue
received by the county from any revenue-producing projects in the
district or any combination thereof.
(b) Enter into an agreement with one or more governmental
entities or other persons to reimburse that entity or person for the
cost of acquiring, improving or equipping, or any combination
thereof, any project to be performed for the purposes of the
district, which may contain such terms as are determined to be
desirable by the board of county commissioners, including the
payment of reasonable interest and other financing costs incurred
by such entity or other person. Any such reimbursement may be
secured by a pledge of, and be payable from, any money pledged
pursuant to section 15 of this act and received by the county with
respect to the district, any revenue received by the county from any
revenue-producing projects in the district or any combination
thereof. Such an agreement is not subject to the limitations of
subsection 1 of NRS 354.626 and may, at the option of the board
of county commissioners, be binding on the county beyond the
fiscal year in which it was made.
2. Before the issuance of any bonds or notes pursuant to this
section, the county must obtain the results of a feasibility study,
-
*SB420_R1*

– 12 –
commissioned by the county, which shows that a sufficient amount
will be generated from money pledged pursuant to section 15 of
this act to make timely payment on the bonds or notes, taking into
account the revenue from any other revenue-producing projects
also pledged for the payment of the bonds or notes, if any. A
failure to make payments of any amounts due:
(a) With respect to any bonds or notes issued pursuant to
subsection 1; or
(b) Under any agreements entered into pursuant to
subsection 1,
 because of any insufficiency in the amount of money pledged
pursuant to section 15 of this act to make those payments shall be
deemed not to constitute a default on those bonds, notes or
agreements.
3. No bond, note or other agreement issued or entered into
pursuant to this section may be secured by or payable from the
general fund of the county, the power of the county to levy ad
valorem property taxes, or any source other than any money
pledged pursuant to section 15 of this act and received by the
county with respect to the district, any revenue received by the
county from any revenue-producing projects in the district or any
combination thereof. No bond, note or agreement issued or
entered into pursuant to this section may ever become a general
obligation of the county or a charge against its general credit or
taxing powers, nor may any such bond, note or agreement become
a debt of the county for the purposes of any limitation on
indebtedness.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, any bond
or note issued pursuant to this section, including any bond or note
issued to refund any such bond or note, must mature on or before,
and any agreement entered into pursuant to this section must
automatically terminate on or before, the end of the fiscal year in
which the term of the district expires.
Sec. 20. The board of county commissioners shall require the
review by an independent auditor of each claim submitted
pursuant to any contract or other agreement made with the board
of county commissioners pursuant to section 19 of this act to
provide any financing or reimbursement.
Sec. 20.3. 1. An owners’ association may submit a request
to the board of county commissioners to modify the district. The
proposed modifications may change the improvements and
activities that are funded by the assessments or the amount of the
assessments.
2. Upon the written request of the owners’ association and
after holding a public hearing, the board of county commissioners
-
*SB420_R1*

– 13 –
may modify the district by ordinance. If the modification requested
by the owners’ association includes a new or increased
assessment, any interested person may make a protest orally or in
writing. A written protest:
(a) Must be filed with the county clerk at or before the time of
the public hearing;
(b) May be withdrawn in writing at any time before the
conclusion of the public hearing;
(c) Must include, without limitation, a description of the
business in which the person submitting the protest has an interest
and written evidence that the business owner or an authorized
representative of the business; and
(d) That does not contain the information required by this
subsection must not be counted in determining whether the
protests are received from the business owners or authorized
representatives of the businesses in the district who will pay more
than 50 percent of the total amount of assessments proposed to be
levied.
3. If protests are received from the business owners or
authorized representatives of the businesses in the district who will
pay more than 50 percent of the total amount of assessments
proposed to be levied by the end of the period to withdraw a
protest, the board of county commissioners shall not take any
further action to modify a district for a period of 1 year from the
date on which the board of county commissioners finds that there
are enough protests to satisfy the requirements of this subsection.
4. Not less than 30 days before holding the public hearing,
the board of county commissioners shall mail a notice of the
meeting to each business owner subject to the assessment. The
notice must include, without limitation:
(a) A general description of the proposed modification;
(b) The address to which business owners or authorized
representatives of the businesses may mail a protest against the
assessments, if applicable;
(c) A statement that if protests are received from the business
owners or authorized representatives of the businesses in the
district who will pay more than 50 percent of the total amount of
assessments proposed to be levied, the board of county
commissioners will be prohibited pursuant to subsection 3 from
modifying the district, if applicable; and
(d) The date, time and location of the public hearing.
5. At the conclusion of a public hearing to modify a district,
the board of county commissioners may adopt, revise, change,
reduce or modify the proposed modifications. If the board of
county commissioners modifies a district, the district management
-
*SB420_R1*

– 14 –
plan maintained by the county clerk must be revised to account for
the modification.
Sec. 20.5. 1. The board of county commissioners may
dissolve by ordinance a district pursuant to this section where
there is no outstanding and unpaid debt incurred to accomplish
the purposes of the district under the following circumstances:
(a) If the board of county commissioners finds that there was a
misappropriation of money, malfeasance or a violation of law
concerning the management of the district; or
(b) Upon written petition of the business owners or authorized
representatives of the businesses in the district who pay 50 percent
or more of the assessments levied pursuant to subsection 2.
2. During each year of the operation of the district, there
must be a 30-day period in which the business owners or
authorized representatives of the businesses in the district may
request the dissolution of the district by written petition. The first
such period must begin 2 years after the date on which the district
is created and each subsequent 30-day period must begin on the
anniversary of the day on which the district was created.
3. Before the board of county commissioners may dissolve a
district, the board of county commissioners shall hold a public
hearing. Not less than 30 days before holding the public hearing,
the board of county commissioners shall mail a notice of the
meeting to each business owner subject to the assessment. The
notice must include, without limitation:
(a) The proposed reasons for dissolving the district; and
(b) The date, time and location of the public hearing.
4. At the conclusion of a public hearing to dissolve a district,
the board of county commissioners may adopt an ordinance to
dissolve the district.
Sec. 20.7. 1. Upon the dissolution or expiration without
renewal of a district, any remaining revenue after all outstanding
debts are paid must be spent in accordance with the district
management plan or returned to the business owners subject to
the assessment in an amount that is proportionate to the amount
of the assessment levied against the business owner.
2. As used in this section, “revenue” includes, without
limitation, money from the levy of an assessment, the sale of assets
acquired by the district or bond reserves or construction funds.
Sec. 21. The provisions of NRS 218D.380 do not apply to any
provision of this act which adds or revises a requirement to submit a
report to the Legislature.
H
-
*SB420_R1*